Washington statutes.
RCW 33.43.020

Federal association—Powers.

Every federal savings and loan association, the home office of which is located in this state, and the savings accounts therein shall have all the rights, powers and privileges and be entitled to the same immunities and exemptions as pertain to savings and loan associations organized under the laws of this state.

[ 1945 c 235 s 117; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-236. Prior: 1939 c 98 s 9; 1933 c 183 s 50. Formerly RCW 33.44.110.]